Alaska statutes. Title 6. Banks and Financial Institutions.
Article 8. Miscellaneous Provisions.

Sec. 06.55.801.
Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing this chapter, consideration shall be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

History.

(§ 1 ch 55 SLA 2007)

Sec. 06.55.802.
Exclusions.

This chapter does not apply to

the United States or a department, an agency, or an instrumentality of the United States;

money transmission by the United States Postal Service or by a contractor on behalf of the United States Postal Service;

a state, a municipality, a county, or another governmental agency or governmental subdivision of a state;

a bank, a bank holding company, an office of an international banking corporation, a branch of a foreign bank, a corporation organized under 12 U.S.C. 1861 — 1867 (Bank Service Company Act), or a corporation organized under 12 U.S.C. 611 — 633 (Edge Act) under the laws of a state or the United States, if it does not issue, sell, or provide payment instruments or stored value through an authorized delegate who is not a bank, a bank holding company, an office of an international banking corporation, a branch of a foreign bank, a corporation organized under 12 U.S.C. 1861 — 1867 (Bank Service Company Act), or a corporation organized under 12 U.S.C. 611 — 633 (Edge Act) under the laws of a state or the United States;

electronic funds transfer of governmental benefits for a federal, state, or municipal agency or a state political subdivision by a contractor on behalf of

the United States or a department, an agency, or an instrumentality of the United States; or

a state, or a department, an agency, or an instrumentality of a state;

a board of trade or a person who, in the ordinary course of business, provides clearance and settlement services for a board of trade, to the extent of the operation of the person for a board of trade; in this paragraph, “board of trade” means a board of trade designated as a contract market under 7 U.S.C. 1 — 27f (Commodity Exchange Act);

a registered futures commission merchant under the federal commodities laws, to the extent of the merchant’s operation as a registered futures commission merchant under the federal commodities laws;

a person who provides clearance or settlement services under a registration as a clearing agency or an exemption from the registration granted under the federal securities laws, to the extent of the person’s operation as a provider of clearance or settlement services under a registration as a clearing agency or an exemption from the registration granted under the federal securities laws;

an operator of a payment system to the extent that the operator provides processing, clearing, or settlement services, between or among persons excluded by this section, in connection with wire transfers, credit card transactions, debit card transactions, stored-value transactions, automated clearinghouse transfers, or similar funds transfers; or

a person registered as a securities broker-dealer under federal or state securities laws, to the extent of the person’s operation as a securities broker-dealer under federal or state securities laws.

History.

(§ 1 ch 55 SLA 2007; am § 1 ch 3 SLA 2017)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2017 amendment, effective July 1, 2017, made a stylistic change in (9).

Sec. 06.55.810.
Notices required.

A money services licensee shall display a sign at each location where the money services licensee

provides money services under this chapter; and

has not designated an authorized delegate to provide money services on behalf of the money services licensee at the location.

An authorized delegate shall display a sign at each location where the authorized delegate provides money services under this chapter.

The sign required by (a) or (b) of this section shall be displayed at all times in full view of persons visiting the location and shall give the department’s address and the department’s telephone number for receiving calls regarding complaints and other concerns about money services licensees, authorized delegates, and the money services provided by money services licensees and authorized delegates.

History.

(§ 1 ch 55 SLA 2007)

Sec. 06.55.820.
Transmission.

Within 10 business days after receiving the money or equivalent value for money transmission, unless otherwise ordered by the customer or unless the money transmission licensee has reason to believe a crime has occurred, is occurring, or may occur as a result of the money transmission, a money transmission licensee shall

transmit after the deduction of fees the monetary equivalent of all money or equivalent value received for the money transmission; or

issue instructions making the money or its monetary equivalent available to the person designated by the customer.

History.

(§ 1 ch 55 SLA 2007)

Sec. 06.55.830.
Receipt.

A money transmission licensee who receives money or equivalent value for a money transmission shall provide a receipt to the customer that clearly states the amount of the money or the equivalent value presented by the customer for the money transmission and the total fees charged by the money transmission licensee.

If a money transmission licensee fixes, when the money transmission is initiated, the rate of exchange for a money transmission to be paid in the currency of another government, the receipt provided by (a) of this section must disclose the rate of exchange for the transaction and any limit on the length of time that the payment will be made at that fixed rate of exchange.

If a money transmission licensee does not fix the rate of exchange for a money transmission to be paid in the currency of another government, the receipt provided under (a) of this section must disclose that the rate of exchange for the money transmission will be set when the person designated by the customer to receive the money takes possession of the money.

History.

(§ 1 ch 55 SLA 2007)

Sec. 06.55.840.
Refunds.

Within 10 days after receiving a written request for a refund, a money transmission licensee shall refund to a customer money equal to the money or equivalent value received from the customer for a money transmission, unless

before receiving the written request

the money has been transmitted to the person designated by the customer to receive the money transmission and the person has taken possession of the money; in this section, “transmitted” means made available to the person designated by the customer to receive the money, whether or not the person designated by the customer has taken possession of the money; or

instructions have been given making a monetary equivalent available to the person designated by the customer to receive the money transmission;

the money transmission licensee has reason to believe that a crime has occurred, is occurring, or may occur as a result of transmitting or refunding the money as requested by the customer; or

the money transmission licensee is otherwise prohibited by law from making a refund.

History.

(§ 1 ch 55 SLA 2007)

Sec. 06.55.850.
Establishment of fees and other charges.

The department shall adopt regulations that establish the amount and manner of payment of fees required under this chapter.

The department shall establish fee levels under (a) of this section so that the total amount of fees collected for both money transmission licenses and currency exchange licenses under this chapter approximately equals the department’s actual total regulatory costs for both money transmission licenses and currency exchange licenses. The department shall set the fee levels so that the fee levels for both money transmission licenses and currency exchange licenses are the same.

The department shall annually review each fee level to determine whether the regulatory costs are approximately equal to fee collections. If the review indicates that fee collections and regulatory costs are not approximately equal, the department shall calculate fee adjustments and adopt regulations under (a) of this section to implement the adjustments.

In January of each year, the department shall report to the office of management and budget all fee levels and revisions made for the previous year under this section.

In this section,

“fee” means an application fee, a money services license fee, a first-year operation fee under AS

06.55.103(a)(2)(C)

, a renewal fee, the daily late fee for not submitting a renewal report and paying the renewal fee under AS

06.55.106

, investigation costs under AS

06.55.105

and

06.55.203

, an examination cost under AS

06.55.401

, and a fee for approving a change of control under AS

06.55.404

;

“regulatory costs” means the costs of the department that are attributable to regulation of money services licensing under this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 55 SLA 2007)

Sec. 06.55.890.
Definitions.

In AS

06.55.820

—

06.55.840

,

“fees” does not include revenue that a money services licensee generates from a money transmission when converting the currency of one government into the currency of another government;

“monetary equivalent” means, for money transmissions that will be redeemed in a currency other than the currency that the customer uses to purchase the money transmission, the amount of money in the currency of the government that the recipient of the money transmission is to receive, as converted at the retail exchange rate offered by the money transmission licensee to the customer for the money transmission;

“money transmission licensee” means a person who holds a money services license and a person who is an authorized delegate.

History.

(§ 1 ch 55 SLA 2007)